Maine, session 132, LD806.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §9854, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2015, c. 429, §19, is
further amended to read:
A. A dentist, dental hygienist, expanded function dental assistant or dental
radiographer licensed under chapter 143;
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §18373, sub-§1, ¶L, as amended by PL 2021, c. 223, §10, is
further amended to read:
L. Supragingival polishing using a slow-speed rotary instrument and rubber cup; and
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §18373, sub-§1, ¶HH, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 223, §10, is
amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR1150(03)

HH. Contour or finish restorative materials using a high-speed, power-driven
handpiece or instrument.; and
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §18373, sub-§1, ¶II is enacted to read:
II. Expose and process radiographs.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR1150(03)